Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0500.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2922d. (1) In a civil action, an individual is not liable for property damages or personal injury, including, but not limited to, death, if the individual was acting in self-defense and if the individual's actions arose from another individual's conduct in furtherance of a riot. (2) As used in this section, "riot" means conduct proscribed under section 1 of 1968 PA 302, MCL 752.541.